Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1869.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FOREST LAKE VETERANS MEMORIAL.new text end new text begin $275,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Forest Lake Veterans Memorial Committee to construct a memorial to veterans of the United States armed forces at Lakeside Memorial Park in the city of Forest Lake. new text end